Hawaii, session 2026, GM1359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the information age
is changing how providers of public acconunodations and public
services communicate with their customers. Many service
providers use websites, software applications, and other
technologies to take reservations, display menus, take orders,
make sales, and provide product information.
The legislature recognizes that ready access to, and the
ability to use, information and communication technology is
essential to allow all citizens to fully engage with and enjoy
public goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, and
accommodations. However, the legislature is aware that some
websites and applications used by public accommodation providers
in the State are not accessible to persons with disabilities,
denying them full and equal access.
The legislature also recognizes that existing federal and
state laws that prohibit discrimination in public accommodations
based on disability could better inform providers of public
2026-2533 SB2852 GDI SMA.docx
NiiiiimiMinniiiiiiim

Page 2
S.B. NO. S?i
C.D. 1
accommodations and benefit persons with disabilities by
clarifying requirements for electronic access.
The legislature further finds that the technical standards,
definitions, compliance schedules, and enforcement procedures
necessary to implement digital accessibility requirements are
regulatory in nature. These matters are best addressed through
administrative rulemaking, which allows for public participation
by persons with disabilities, businesses of all sizes, and other
interested parties, and allows for updating as technology
evolves.
The legislature additionally finds that the Hawaii civil
rights commission has existing statutory authority to define,
implement, and enforce the prohibition against discriminatory
practices by places of public accommodation, and that this
authority extends to discriminatory practices carried out
through information and communication technology. Explicit
rulemaking authority will confirm and give effect to that
authority and provide clear, workable guidance to the disability
community and business community.
2026-2533 SB2852 CDl SMA.docx 2
iiiiiHimiiuiiiiiiniiiiiiD

Pages 2852
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D.2
C.D. 1
The legislature notes that a working draft of proposed
rules has been prepared for consideration by the Hawaii civil
rights commission.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Direct the Hawaii civil rights commission to adopt
rules implementing the prohibition against the use of
inaccessible information and communication technology,
consistent with the United States Department of
Justice Title II web accessibility framework; and
(2) Establish that it is an unlawful discriminatory
practice for a place of public accommodation to deny a
person with a disability full and equal enjoyment of
the goods, services, facilities, privileges,
advantages, or accommodations of a place of public
accommodation, or information related thereto, by
requiring the use of information and communication
technology that is not accessible to the person with a
disability.
SECTION 2. Chapter 489, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
2026-2533 SB2852 CDl SMA.docx 3
llUilflIIMIHIIIIHMIH

Page 4 2852
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
"§489- Digital accessibility; rulemaking, (a) The
civil rights coininission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91
to implement the prohibition established in section 489-5(c),
(b) The rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be
consistent with the web accessibility framework established by
the United States Department of Justice in its Title II final
rule on web accessibility, title 28 Code of Federal Regulations
part 35, as in effect on June 24, 2024,
(c) A violation of rules adopted pursuant to this section
shall constitute an unlawful discriminatory practice under this
chapter, subject to all remedies available under this chapter.
The civil rights commission shall process complaints alleging
such violations pursuant to its authority under this chapter and
its procedural rules under chapter 368."
SECTION 3. Section 489-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§489-5 Other discriminatory practices. (a) It [4re]
shall be a discriminatory practice for two or more persons to
conspire to:
2026-2533 SB2852 CDl SMA.docx
lilllllllllllllllMMWinH

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) [To rct-aliatc] Retaliate or discriminate against a
person because the person has opposed an unfair
discriminatory practice;
(2) [To aid-?'] Aid, abet, incite, or coerce a person to
engage in a discriminatory practice; or
(3) Wilfully [7—fee] obstruct [7-] or prevent [7-] a person from
complying with this chapter.
(b) It [ie] shall be a discriminatory practice to deny a
person the full and equal enjoyment of the goods, services,
facilities, privileges, advantages, and accommodations of a
place of public [aeeommodetiens] accommodation because of the
known disability of an individual with whom the person is known
to have a relationship or association.
(^J It shai;l^e a di scriinijnat^ry£ra£tAce t^deny a joerson
with a disability full and equal enjoyment of the goods,
services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations
of a place of public accommodation, or information related to
the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or
accommodations, by requiring the use of information and
communication technology that is not accessible to the person.”
2026-2533 SB2852 GDI SMA.docx
IfflllllMMIIIIMIIilHIIIIII

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2533 SB2852 CDl SMA.docx 6
IliMIIIIIHMIHIIUIIIIH

2852
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 14th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 2852, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
93-26

SB No. 2852, SD 1, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives